Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle C. Revocation of Certificate of Authority.

§79-4-15.30.
Grounds for revocation.

The Secretary of State may commence a proceeding under Section 79-4-15.31 to revoke the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state if:

The foreign corporation does not deliver its annual report to the Secretary of State within sixty (60) days after it is due;

The foreign corporation does not pay within sixty (60) days after they are due any franchise taxes or penalties imposed by Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. or other law;

The foreign corporation is without a registered agent in this state for sixty (60) days or more;

The foreign corporation does not inform the Secretary of State by an appropriate filing that its registered agent has changed or that its registered agent has resigned, within sixty (60) days of the change or resignation;

An incorporator, director, officer or agent of the foreign corporation signed a document he knew was false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing;

The Secretary of State receives a duly authenticated certificate from the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law the foreign corporation is incorporated stating that it has been dissolved or disappeared as the result of a merger.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 15.30; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 45, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment deleted “or registered office” following “a registered agent” in (3); and in (4), deleted references to “registered office” and substituted ‘inform the Secretary of State by an appropriate filing‘ for ‘inform the Secretary of State under Section
79-4-15.08 or 79-4-15.09.”

Procedures for and effect of revocation of foreign corporation’s certificate of authority, see § 79-4-15.31.

Administrative revocation, under this section and §§ 79-4-15.31 and 79-4-15.32, of foreign professional corporations certificate of authority, see § 79-10-95.

Revocation of certificate of authority under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-385 through 79-11-389.

A foreign corporation, whose certificate of authority to do business within the State was suspended after it filed a breach of lease action, was not required to become reinstated as a condition for proceeding to trial. Capital Associates, Inc. v. Sally Southland, Inc., 529 So. 2d 640, 1988 Miss. LEXIS 338 (Miss. 1988).

Foreign corporation’s leasing of personal property as doing business within statutes prescribing conditions of right to do business.
50 A.L.R.3d 1020.

State regulation of land ownership by alien corporation.
21 A.L.R.4th 1329.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 176,
177,
398- 401.

20 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1810, 1843.

An analysis of Mississippi’s treatment of foreign corporations.
55 Miss L. J. 259, June, 1985.

§79-4-15.31.
Procedure for and effect of revocation.

If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist under Section 79-4-15.30 for revocation of a certificate of authority, he shall serve the foreign corporation with written notice of his determination under Section 79-4-15.10, except that such determination may be served by first class mail.

If the foreign corporation does not correct each ground for revocation or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist within sixty (60) days after service of the notice is perfected under Section 79-4-15.10, the Secretary of State may revoke the foreign corporation’s certificate of authority by signing a certificate of revocation that recites the ground or grounds for revocation and its effective date. The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the foreign corporation under Section 79-4-15.10, except that such certificate may be served by first-class mail.

The authority of a foreign corporation to transact business in this state ceases on the date shown on the certificate revoking its certificate of authority.

The Secretary of State’s revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority appoints the Secretary of State the foreign corporation’s agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action which arose during the time the foreign corporation was authorized to transact business in this state. Service of process on the Secretary of State under the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure is service on the foreign corporation. Upon receipt of process, the Secretary of State shall mail a copy of the process to the secretary of the foreign corporation at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report or in any subsequent communication received from the corporation stating the current mailing address of its principal office, or, if none are on file, in its application for a certificate of authority.

Revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

The administrative revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority shall not impair the validity of any contract, deed, mortgage, security interest, lien or act of such foreign corporation or prevent the foreign corporation from defending any action, suit or proceeding with any court of this state.

A foreign corporation whose registration has been administratively revoked may not maintain any action, suit or proceeding in any court of this state until such foreign corporation’s certificate of authority has been reinstated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 15.31; Laws, 1991, ch. 509, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 46; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 41, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

Section 41 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 24, 2012), amended this section. Section 46 of Chapter 382, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 17, 2012), also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 41 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, which contains language that specifically provides that it supersedes § 79-4-15.31 as amended by Laws of 2012, ch. 382.

The first 2012 amendment (ch. 382), substituted “the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure” for “this subsection” in the second sentence of (d).

The second 2012 amendment (ch. 481), effective January 1, 2013, substituted “the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure” for “this subsection” preceding “is service on the foreign corporation” in (d); and added (f) and (g).

Service of process, notice or demand on foreign corporation which has had its certificate of authority revoked under this section, see § 79-4-15.10.

Authority and grounds for Secretary of State to commence proceeding under § 79-4-15.31 to revoke certificate of authority of foreign corporation, see § 79-4-15.30.

Appeal from revocation, see § 79-4-15.32.

Administrative revocation, under this section and §§ 79-4-15.30 and 79-4-15.32, of foreign professional corporation’s certificate of authority, see § 79-10-95.

Revocation of certificate of authority under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-385 through 79-11-389.

Foreign corporation’s leasing of personal property as doing business within statutes prescribing conditions of right to business.
50 A.L.R.3d 1020.

State regulation of land ownership by alien corporation.
21 A.L.R.4th 1329.

Reinstatement of repealed, forfeited, expired, or suspended corporate charter as validating interim acts of corporation.
42 A.L.R.4th 392.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 176, 177, 396 et seq.

12 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Foreign Corporations, Forms 31, 32.

8 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 122:52.

20 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1843-1867.

An analysis of Mississippi’s treatment of foreign corporations.
55 Miss L. J. 259, June, 1985.

§79-4-15.32.
Appeal from revocation.

A foreign corporation whose certificate of authority is administratively revoked under Section 79-4-15.31 may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement at any time after the effective date of such revocation. The application must:

Recite the name of the corporation and the effective date of the administrative revocation;

State that the ground or grounds for revocation either did not exist or have been eliminated;

State that the corporation’s name satisfies the requirements of Section 79-4-4.01; and

Contain a certificate from the Mississippi Department of Revenue reciting that the corporation has properly filed all reports and paid all taxes and penalties required by revenue laws of this state.

If the Secretary of State determines that the application contains the information required by subsection (a) and that the information is correct, he shall reinstate the certificate of authority, prepare a certificate that recites his determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the corporation under Section 79-35-13.

When the reinstatement is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative revocation. Any liability incurred by the foreign corporation or a director, officer or shareholder after the administrative revocation and before the reinstatement shall be determined as if the administrative revocation had never occurred, and the corporation resumes carrying on its business as if the administrative revocation had never occurred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 15.32; Laws, 1991, ch. 509, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 14; Laws, 2009, ch. 527, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 530, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 47; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 42, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

Section 3 of ch. 527, Laws of 2009, effective from and after July 1, 2009 (approved April 13, 2009), amended this section. Section 4 of ch. 530, Laws of 2009, effective from and after July 1, 2009 (approved April 14, 2009), also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 3 of ch. 527, Laws of 2009, which contains language that specifically provides that it supersedes § 79-4-15.32 as amended by Chapter 530, Laws of 2009.

Section 42 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 24, 2012), amended this section. Section 47 of Chapter 382, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 17, 2012), also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 42 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, which contains language that specifically provides that it supersedes § 79-4-15.32 as amended by Laws of 2012, ch. 382.

The first 2009 amendment (ch. 527) substituted “at any time” for “within five (5) years” in the first sentence of the introductory language of (a).

The second 2009 amendment (ch. 530) substituted “at any time” for “within five (5) years” in the first sentence of the introductory language of (a).

The first 2012 amendment (ch. 382), substituted “Department of Revenue” for “State Tax Commission” in (a)(4); and substituted “Section 79-35-13” for “Section 79-4-5.04” at the end of (b).

The second 2012 amendment (ch. 481), effective January 1, 2013, substituted “Department of Revenue” for “State Tax Commission” in (a)(4); substituted “Section 79-35-13” for “Section 79-4-5.04” at the end of (b); and divided former (c) into two sentences by adding the period and “Any liability incurred...revocation had never occurred.”

Administrative revocation, under this section and §§ 79-4-15.30 and 79-4-15.32, of foreign professional corporation’s certificate of authority, see § 79-10-95.

Revocation of certificate of authority under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-385 through 79-11-389.

Reinstatement of repealed, forfeited, expired, or suspended corporate charter as validating interim acts of corporation.
42 A.L.R.4th 392.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 176, 177, 399.

8 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 122:74, 122:75.

§79-4-15.33.
Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

If the Secretary of State denies a foreign corporation’s application for reinstatement following administrative revocation, he shall serve the corporation with a written communication that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

The corporation may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County or the chancery court of the county where the corporation is domiciled or where the corporation’s principal office is located within thirty (30) days after service of the communication of denial is perfected. The corporation appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the revocation and attaching to the petition copies of the Secretary of State’s communication of denial.

The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the revoked corporation or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 509, § 5; Laws, 2009, ch. 527, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 48, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2009 amendment inserted “or the chancery court of the county where the corporation is domiciled” in (b).

The 2012 amendment deleted “under Section 79-4-5.04, Mississippi Code of 1972” following “serve the corporation” in (a); and inserted “or where the corporation’s principal office is located” near the end of the first sentence in (b).

Revocation of certificate of authority under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-385 through 79-11-389.